Vermont, session 2025-2026, H332.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1 10 V.S.A. § 2 is added to read:
§ 2. SMALL BUSINESS TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE EXCHANGE
(a) There is created the Small Business Technical Assistance Exchange, a
business assistance program through which the regional development
corporations shall provide small- and mid-sized businesses with professional
and technical assistance:
(1) through in-house Business Navigators;
VT LEG #380933 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.332
2025 Page 2 of 4
(2) through partnerships with organizations specializing in outreach to
mature workers; youth; individuals with disabilities; individuals who have
been involved with the correction system; Black, Indigenous, and Persons of
Color Vermonters; New Americans; and other historically marginalized
populations; and
(3) through grants to private providers for professional services,
including:
(A) business operations, financial management, and grant writing;
(B) digital strategies;
(C) architecture and physical space design;
(D) reconfiguring manufacturing equipment and processes and
incorporating safety measures;
(E) technology and software consulting;
(F) legal and other professional services; and
(G) other technical assistance.
(b)(1) Through the Exchange, the regional development corporations shall
maintain a directory of, and build connections to, Vermont technical assistance
providers who have demonstrated the ability and expertise to assist businesses
with critical tools to grow and adapt their businesses to the ever-changing
business climate.
VT LEG #380933 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.332
2025 Page 3 of 4
(2) The Exchange shall award technical assistance grants of not more
than $5,000.00 per business for technical services from approved providers.
(3) To be eligible to receive technical assistance through the Exchange,
a business shall:
(A) be a for-profit entity located in Vermont; and
(B) have at least $5,000.00 in average annual revenue.
(4) A business whose owner’s income is higher than the federal labor
market area in which the business operates, as evidenced by a self-attestation
provided by the owner, shall provide a 50 percent match for the costs of
professional services funded by a grant.
(c) The regional development corporations shall:
(1) operate the Exchange to produce benefits for both the client
companies as well as the vendors providing the assistance; and
(2) conduct outreach and direct engagement to promote participation by
businesses in rural areas of this State and businesses owned by mature
workers; youth; individuals with disabilities; individuals who have been
involved with the correction system; Black, Indigenous, and Persons of Color
Vermonters; New Americans; and other historically marginalized populations.
(d) The regional development corporations shall publish a report on the
activities and performance of the Exchange on or before January 15 and July
15 each year.
VT LEG #380933 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.332
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. RURAL BUSINESS TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE EXCHANGE;
APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2026, the amount of $1,250,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development for a
subgrant to provide services and assistance through the Small Business
Technical Assistance Exchange created in 10 V.S.A. § 2.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380933 v.1